District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.02

Establishment and maintenance of classification system for Career, Legal, Excepted, and Management Supervisory Services employees.

(a)

In order to carry out the policies of § 1-611.01, the Mayor shall provide for the development of a classification system covering all positions in the Career, Legal, Excepted, and the Management Supervisory Services.

(b)

The Mayor shall provide that all positions covered by this classification system are properly described in writing in accordance with the principal duties and responsibilities officially assigned to those positions and shall provide that all positions are properly evaluated by application of official classification standards, in accordance with accepted classification principles and techniques and in accordance with applicable rules and regulations. The Mayor shall provide for meaningful consultation with the District of Columbia Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia in the classification of positions of persons in the Career Service employed by the educational Boards.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Classification systems or proposals developed under the authority of this section shall be published in the District of Columbia Register at least 60 days prior to their proposed effective date. The Mayor shall hold a public hearing on all such proposals he or she publishes in the District of Columbia Register prior to his or her adoption of a classification system(s) or amendment to such system(s).

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1102, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(l), 33 DCR 7241
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(k), 43 DCR 2978
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(n)(1), 45 DCR 2464
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 103(n), 47 DCR 520
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 3(g), 49 DCR 8140
This section is referenced in § 1-611.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-612.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-341.2.
D.C. Law 13-91, in subsec. (a), inserted “Legal,”.
D.C. Law 14-213, in subsec. (a), substituted “Excepted, and the Management Supervisory Services” for “and the Excepted Services”.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-203, December 8, 1999, 46 DCR 10456).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-293, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2063).

Repeal of § 3 of Law 6-177: Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 provided that the provisions of § 3 are repealed on the 1st day following the 36-month period after February 24, 1987.

Repeal of § 4(b) of Law 6-177: Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 8-74, effective March 15, 1990, provided that § 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 is repealed.

Applicability of § 101(n) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.